Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.040

Subrogation of surety—Rights of contractor.

This proceeding may be had in favor of any surety or other person jointly bound with the defendant. It may also be prosecuted by the person in whose favor the contract exists, against any one or more of the persons bound thereby, upon filing such affidavit, when the co-contractors are nonresidents or probably insolvent, or at the request of any of them when they are residents and solvent.

[Code 1881 s 640; 1877 p 133 s 643; 1869 p 150 s 580; 1854 p 210 s 422; RRS s 781.]